Connecticut, session 2026, SB00092.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Employee" means an individual who is employed at a warehouse
distribution center and who is not exempt from the minimum wage and
overtime requirements of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as
amended from time to time. "Employee" does not include a driver or
courier traveling to or from a warehouse distribution center;
(2) "Employer" means an individual, corporation, partnership,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability
company, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency,
instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity, whether
domestic or foreign, that directly or indirectly, or through an agent or
any other person, including through the services of a third-party
employer, temporary services, staffing agency, independent contractor
LCO No. 183 1 of 6

Governor's Bill No. 92
or any similar entity, at any time in the prior twelve months, employs
or exercises control over the wages, hours or working conditions of two
hundred fifty or more employees at a single warehouse distribution
center in the state or one thousand or more employees at one or more
warehouse distribution centers in the state;
(3) "Quota" means a work performance standard under which an
employee is assigned or required to perform at a specified productivity
speed or a quantified number of tasks or to handle or produce a
quantified amount of material within a defined time period and under
which the employee may suffer an adverse employment action if the
employee fails to complete or meet such work performance standard;
(4) "Work speed data" means information an employer collects,
stores, analyzes or interprets relating to an individual employee's
performance of a quota, including, but not limited to, quantities of tasks
performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates
or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee
performance in relation to a quota and time categorized as performing
tasks or not performing tasks. "Work speed data" does not include wage
statements or data an employer collects, stores, analyzes or interprets
that does not relate to the performance of a quota, except for any content
of such records that includes work speed data; and
(5) "Warehouse distribution center" means an establishment as
defined by any of the following North American Industry Classification
System Codes, however such establishment is denominated: (A) 493110
for General Warehousing and Storage; (B) 423 for Merchant
Wholesalers, Durable Goods; (C) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers,
Nondurable Goods; (D) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order
Houses; or (E) 492110 for Couriers and Express Delivery Services.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
an employer shall provide to each employee a written description of
each quota to which such employee is subject, including any potential
LCO No. 183 2 of 6

Governor's Bill No. 92
adverse employment action that may result from a failure to satisfy such
quota. Such written description shall be provided to an employer's
current employees not later than August 1, 2027. For employees hired
after August 1, 2027, such written description shall be provided to the
employee upon hire.
(b) Whenever an employer makes a change to an existing quota for
an employee that results in a new quota for such employee, an employer
shall:
(1) Notify the employee of such change as soon as possible, either
verbally or in writing, and prior to the effective date of such new quota;
and
(2) Provide the employee with a written description of the new quota
to which such employee is subject not later than two business days after
the change is made.
(c) Any written description required pursuant to this section shall be
provided directly to an employee by a manager during such employee's
work hours.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
no quota shall (1) prevent compliance with the provisions of section 31-
51ii of the general statutes concerning meal periods, or (2) interfere with
an employee's use of the bathroom facilities, including reasonable travel
time to and from the bathroom facilities.
(b) Paid and unpaid breaks shall not be considered productive time
for the purposes of any quota or an employee productivity monitoring
system unless the employee is required to remain on call.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2027, no
employer shall take any adverse action against an employee for failing
to satisfy a quota that (1) violates the provisions of subsection (a) of
section 3 of this act, or (2) has not previously been provided to the
LCO No. 183 3 of 6

Governor's Bill No. 92
employee pursuant to section 2 of this act.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2027, each
employer shall establish, maintain and preserve contemporaneous, true
and accurate records of (1) each individual employee's work speed data;
(2) the aggregated work speed data for similar employees at the same
warehouse distribution center; and (3) the written description provided
to each employee pursuant to section 2 of this act. Such records shall be
maintained for a period of three years. Nothing in this section shall
require an employer to establish, maintain and preserve the records
required pursuant to this section if such employer does not assign or
require quotas or collect, store, analyze or interpret work speed data.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
if an employee believes satisfying a quota caused or will cause a
violation of section 3 of this act, such employee may request from such
employee's employer: (1) A written description of each quota the
employee is subject to; (2) a copy of the employee's personal work speed
data for the prior ninety days; and (3) a copy of aggregated work speed
data for similar employees at the same warehouse distribution center
for the prior ninety days.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, a former employee may request from a
former employer: (1) A written description of each quota the employee
was subject to for the ninety days prior to the employee's separation
from employment with such employer; (2) a copy of the employee's
personal work speed data for the ninety days prior to such employee's
separation from employment with such employer; and (3) a copy of
100 aggregated work speed data for similar employees at the same
101 warehouse distribution center for the ninety days prior to such
102 employee's separation from employment with such employer. A former
103 employee may only make one request under this section.
104 (c) An employer shall provide a written copy of any records
105 requested pursuant to this section not later than five calendar days after
LCO No. 183 4 of 6

Governor's Bill No. 92
106 receipt of such request. Such written copy shall be provided (1) in both
107 English and the primary language of the employee requesting such
108 records, and (2) (A) for a current employee, directly to the employee
109 requesting such records by a manager during such employee's work
110 hours, or (B) for a former employee, either at a mutually convenient time
111 or via a mutually convenient delivery method.
112 Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
113 no employer shall discharge or in any way retaliate, discriminate or take
114 any adverse action against any employee or former employee for (1)
115 making a request pursuant to section 6 of this act, or (2) filing a civil
116 action pursuant to section 8 of this act.
117 (b) On and after July 1, 2027, if an employer discharges or in any way
118 retaliates, discriminates or takes any adverse action against any
119 employee or former employee within ninety days after such employee
120 engages in or attempts to engage in the activities described in subsection
121 (a) of this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such
122 adverse action is in violation of this section. Such presumption may be
123 rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that (1) the adverse action
124 was taken for other permissible reasons, and (2) the employee engaging
125 or attempting to engage in the activities described in subsection (a) of
126 this section was not a motivating factor in the employer taking such
127 adverse action.
128 Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
129 an employee aggrieved by a violation of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
130 act, or the Attorney General on behalf of an employee aggrieved by a
131 violation of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act, may bring a civil action
132 in the Superior Court to recover damages, civil penalties and such
133 equitable and injunctive relief as the court deems appropriate. Any
134 party who prevails in such civil action may be awarded reasonable
135 attorney's fees and costs to be taxed by the court.
136 (b) An employer who violates a provision of section 2 to 7, inclusive,
LCO No. 183 5 of 6

Governor's Bill No. 92
137 of this act may be assessed a civil penalty by the court of (1) one
138 thousand dollars for a first violation, (2) two thousand dollars for a
139 second violation, or (3) three thousand dollars for a third or subsequent
140 violations.
141 Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2027, the
142 Workers' Compensation Commission shall monitor the injury rates of
143 employees working in warehouse distribution centers in the state. If an
144 employer is found to have an annual injury rate at or over one and one-
145 half times the average annual injury rate for the relevant North
146 American Industry Classification System codes, based on data reported
147 to the federal Occupational and Safety and Health Administration, the
148 Workers' Compensation Commission shall notify the Labor
149 Commissioner and the commissioner shall determine whether an
150 investigation concerning potential violations of sections 2 to 7, inclusive,
151 of this act is appropriate.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 New section